North Carolina statutes. Chapter 28A. Administration of Decedents’ Estates.
Article 11. Collectors.

§ 28A-11-1.
Appointment and qualifications of collectors.

When for any reason other than a situation provided for in Chapter 28B or Chapter 28C entitled “Estates of Absentees in Military Service” and “Estates of Missing Persons” a delay is encountered in the issuance of letters to a personal representative or
when, in any case, the clerk of superior court finds that the best interest of the estate would be served by the appointment of a collector, the clerk of superior court may issue letters of collection to any person or persons not disqualified
to act as a personal representative under

G.S. 28A-4-2

.

History.
R.C., c. 46, s. 9; C.C.P., s. 463; 1868-9, c. 113, s. 115; Code, s. 1383; Rev., s. 22; C.S., s. 24; 1924, c. 43; 1965, c. 815, s. 2; 1967, c. 24, s. 14; 1973, c. 1329, s. 3; 2011-344, s. 4.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2011-344, s. 4, effective January 1, 2012, and applicable to estates of decedents dying on or after that date, substituted “the clerk of superior court may” for “he may.”

§ 28A-11-2.
Oath and bond.

Every collector shall take an oath as prescribed in

G.S. 28A-7-1

and give bond as required in Article 8 of this Chapter for personal representatives.

History.
C.C.P., s. 464; Code, s. 1384; Rev., s. 23; C.S., s. 25; 1973, c. 1329, s. 3.

§ 28A-11-3.
Duties and powers of collectors.

Every collector shall:

Take such possession, custody, or control of the personal property of the decedent as in the exercise of reasonable judgment the collector deems necessary to its preservation;

Publish notices to creditors as provided by Article 14 of this Chapter;

Collect claims payable to the estate;

Maintain and defend actions in behalf of the estate;

File inventories, accounts, and other reports in the same manner as is required of personal representatives;

Renew obligations of the decedent in the same manner as the personal representative is allowed to do under the provisions of Article 13 of this Chapter; and

Under the express direction and supervision of the clerk of superior court, possess, exercise and perform all other powers, duties and liabilities given to personal representatives by Article 13 of this Chapter.

Reserved.

History.
R.C., c. 46, s. 6; C.C.P., s. 465; 1868-9, c. 113, s. 115; Code, s. 1385; Rev., s. 24; C.S., s. 26; 1973, c. 1329, s. 3; 2011-344, s. 4.

§ 28A-11-4.
When collectors’ powers cease; settlement of accounts.

When letters testamentary or letters of administration are issued, or when in any case the clerk of superior court terminates the appointment of the collector, the powers of the collector cease.

Upon the termination of the collector’s appointment, the collector shall surrender to the personal representative or to the person otherwise entitled thereto or to the clerk all assets of the estate under this control and shall file with the clerk a verified
statement of:

The collector’s accounts since the collector’s qualification, or if the collector has previously filed an account, a statement of the collector’s accounts since the date thereof;

The assets of the estate and their location;

The debts and liabilities of the estate;

All facts and circumstances known to the collector the disclosure of which is necessary for a full and fair assessment of the collector’s conduct of the office; and

All additional facts and circumstances known to the collector the disclosure of which is necessary for a full and fair understanding of all matters concerning the estate.

The clerk of superior court shall examine the account of the collector and if the clerk finds all of the accounts proper, the clerk shall by order approve the account.

History.
R.C., c. 46, s. 7; C.C.P., s. 466; 1868-9, c. 113, s. 115; Code, s. 1386; Rev., s. 25; C.S., s. 27; 1973, c. 1329, s. 3; 2011-344, s. 4.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2011-344, s. 4, effective January 1, 2012, and applicable to estates of decedents dying on or after that date, throughout subsection (b), substituted “the collector’s” for “his,” or similar language; and in subsection (c), twice substituted
“the clerk” for “he.”

§ 28A-11-5.
Compensation.

A collector shall be compensated in accordance with Article 23 of this Chapter.

History.
1977, c. 814, s. 4.